Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.040

Contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Contributions to candidates for state office made and received before December 3, 1992, are considered to be contributions under RCW 29B.20.050, 29B.40.020 through 29B.40.040, 29B.40.140 through 29B.40.230, 29B.40.240, 29B.45.020, and 29B.45.030. Monetary contributions that exceed the contribution limitations and that have not been spent by the recipient of the contribution by December 3, 1992, must be disposed of in accordance with RCW 29B.40.090.

(2) Contributions to other candidates subject to the contribution limits of this title made and received before June 7, 2006, are considered to be contributions under RCW 29B.20.050, 29B.40.020 through 29B.40.040, 29B.40.140 through 29B.40.230, 29B.40.240, 29B.45.020, and 29B.45.030. Contributions that exceed the contribution limitations and that have not been spent by the recipient of the contribution by June 7, 2006, must be disposed of in accordance with RCW 29B.40.090 except for subsections (6) and (7) of that section.

[ 2024 c 164 s 446; 2011 c 60 s 25; 2006 c 348 s 4; 1993 c 2 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.415, 42.17.700.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.